District of Columbia statutes.
47-2605

Prosecutions.

All prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or any of his assistants.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 675, ch. 690, title II, § 3
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
renumbered as § 5, Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(j), 52 DCR 2638
Criminal procedure, conduct of prosecutions, see § 23-101.
1981 Ed., § 47-2605.
1973 Ed., § 47-1803.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.